Alabama, session 2026rs, SB37.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section
40-23-4.1, Code of Alabama 1975, purchases of tangible
personal property by an Alabama taxpayer in an Alabama
municipality other than his or her place of residence shall be
exempt from the payment of any municipal sales and use taxes
upon proof of residency by the taxpayer.
Page 1

upon proof of residency by the taxpayer.
SB37 INTRODUCED
Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
1, 2026.
Page 2